test/src/morphology/N-vuvll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vuˊvll a-stem kahle: # Noun - full paradigm
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Nom: vuˊvll
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Gen: vuuˊl
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Acc: vuuˊl
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Ill: voulla
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Loc: vuuˊlest
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Com: vuuˊlin
     vuˊvll+N+Ess: vuˊvllen
     vuˊvll+N+Par: vuˊvlled
     vuˊvll+N+Sg+Abe: vuuˊltää
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Nom: vuuˊl
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Gen: vuuˊli
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Acc: vuuˊlid
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Ill: vuuˊlid
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Loc: vuuˊlin
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Com: vuuˊlivuiˊm
     vuˊvll+N+Pl+Abe: vuuˊlitää
